Hawaii statutes.
§663-1.9 Exception to liability for health
care provider, authorized person withdrawing blood or urine at the direction of
a police officer. (a) Any health care provider who, in good faith in
compliance with section 291E-21, provides notice concerning the alcohol
concentration of a person's blood or drug content of a person's blood or urine
shall be immune from any civil liability in any action based upon the
compliance. The health care provider also shall be immune from any civil
liability for participating in any subsequent judicial proceeding relating to
the person's compliance.

(b) Any authorized person who properly
withdraws blood or collects urine from another person at the written request of
a police officer for testing of the blood's alcohol concentration or drug
content or the drug content of the urine, and any hospital, laboratory, or
clinic, employing or utilizing the services of such person, and owning or
leasing the premises on which the tests are performed, shall not be liable for
civil damages resulting from the authorized person's acts or omissions in
withdrawing the blood or collecting urine, except for such damages as may
result from the authorized person's gross negligence or wanton acts or
omissions.

(c) For the purpose of this section:

"Authorized person" means a person
authorized under section 291E-12 to withdraw blood at the direction of a police
officer.

"Health care provider" has the same
meaning as in section 291E-21. [L 1986, c 196, §1; am L 1997, c 101, §2; am L
2000, c 189, §26]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next